New York, session 2025-2026, A3888.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 6303 of the insurance law, as 2 amended by chapter 490 of the laws of 2011, paragraph 3 as amended by 3 chapter 75 of the laws of 2013 and the opening paragraph of paragraph 3 4 as amended by chapter 158 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 (a) The exemption that may be granted pursuant to this article shall 7 apply only if [the business is underwritten and transacted from an 8 office within this state; and]: 9 (1) the risk, as defined in regulations of the superintendent, produc- 10 es a minimum annual premium in excess of one hundred thousand dollars or 11 such higher amount as the superintendent may prescribe by regulation; 12 (2) the coverage is for a risk or class of risks which is of an unusu- 13 al nature, a high loss hazard, or difficult to place, pursuant to a list 14 promulgated or amended by the superintendent; or 15 (3) until June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-seven, the policy, other 16 than a medical malpractice insurance policy, is issued to a large 17 commercial insured that employs or retains a special risk manager to 18 assist in the negotiation and purchase of a policy exempted under this 19 article, provided, however, that: 20 (A)(i) the special risk manager is not employed by the insurer issuing 21 the policy or any person in the insurer's holding company system; and 22 (ii) the special risk manager is licensed as an insurance producer in 23 this state pursuant to article twenty-one of this chapter, unless 24 exempted from licensing therein; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07792-01-5 A. 3888 2 1 (B) a policy form that has not been previously filed with the super- 2 intendent shall be filed with the superintendent for informational 3 purposes within three business days after first delivery of a policy 4 using such form, but no later than sixty calendar days after the incep- 5 tion date of such policy. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.